California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) Assign to the state any rights to medical support and to payments for medical care from a third party that an individual may have on his or her own behalf or on behalf of any other family member for whom that individual has the legal authority to assign those rights, and is applying
 for or receiving medical services. Receipt of medical services under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) shall operate as an assignment by operation of law. If those rights are assigned pursuant to this subdivision, the assignee may become an assignee of record by the local child support agency or other public official filing with the court clerk an affidavit showing that an assignment has been made or that there has been an assignment by operation of law. This procedure does not limit any other means by which the assignee may become an assignee of record.

(2) Cooperate, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 11477, with the local child support agency in establishing the paternity of a child born out of wedlock with respect to whom medical services are requested or claimed, and for whom that individual can legally assign the rights described in paragraph (1), and in obtaining any medical support, as provided in Section
 17400 of the Family Code, and payments, as described in paragraph (1), due any person for whom medical services are requested or obtained.

(3) Cooperate with the state in identifying and providing information to assist the state in pursuing any third party who may be liable to pay for care and services available under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) The local child support agency shall verify that the applicant or recipient refused to offer reasonable cooperation prior to determining that the applicant or recipient is ineligible. The granting of medical services shall not be delayed or denied if the applicant is otherwise eligible, if the applicant completes the necessary forms and agrees to cooperate with the district attorney in securing medical support and determining paternity, where applicable.

(c) An applicant or
 beneficiary shall be considered to be cooperating with the local child support agency and shall be eligible for medical services, if otherwise eligible, if the applicant or beneficiary cooperates to the best of his or her ability or has good cause for refusal to cooperate with the requirements in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), as defined by Section 11477.04. The county welfare department shall make the determination of whether good cause for refusal to cooperate exists.

(d) The county welfare department and the local child support agency shall ensure that all applicants for or beneficiaries of medical services under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) are properly notified of the conditions imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14008.7.

If the applicant or beneficiary does not cooperate in the manner described in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 14008.6 to establish paternity and medical support orders against the noncustodial parents of each of the children for whom Medi-Cal services are requested or received, without good cause, as described in Section 11477.04, the applicant or beneficiary shall be ineligible for aid under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200). An applicant’s or beneficiary’s refusal to cooperate shall not effect the eligibility of the child or children.
 If otherwise eligible, the child or children may be granted Medi-Cal or continue to receive Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.

(a) Any applicant for, or beneficiary of Medi-Cal, or person acting on behalf of an applicant or beneficiary shall be informed as to the provisions of eligibility and, in writing, of their responsibility for reporting facts material to a correct determination of eligibility and spend down of excess income.

(b) Any
 applicant for, or beneficiary of Medi-Cal, or person acting on behalf of an applicant or beneficiary shall be responsible for reporting accurately and completely within their competence those facts required of them pursuant to subdivision (a) and to report promptly any changes in those facts.

(c) If, because of a failure to report facts in accordance with subdivision (b), the beneficiary received health care to which
 they were not entitled, they shall be liable to repay any overpayment. The amount of overpayment shall be based on the amount of excess income or resources and computed in accordance with overpayment regulations promulgated by the director.

(d) No liability for overpayment shall result from circumstances where there is a failure on the part of an applicant or beneficiary to perform an act constituting a condition of eligibility, if the failure is caused by an error made by the department or a county welfare department, or where the beneficiary reported facts in accordance with subdivision (b) but a county welfare department failed to act on those facts.

(e) When the department determines that an overpayment has occurred, the department shall seek to recover the full amount of the overpayment by appropriate action under state law against
 the income or resources of the beneficiary or the income and resources of any person who is financially responsible for the cost of their health care pursuant to Section 14008.

(f) The department shall advise the beneficiary of the overpayment, the amount they are liable to repay, and of
 their entitlement to a hearing on the propriety of the action pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2.

(g) No civil or criminal action may be commenced against any person based on alleged unlawful application for or receipt of health care services, where the case record of the person has been destroyed after the expiration of the retention period provided pursuant to Section 10851.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 103.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, with the amendments made to this section by the act that added subdivision (g), to do all of the following:

(1) Limit Medi-Cal estate recovery only for those services required to be collected under federal law.

(2) Limit the definition
 of “estate” to include only the real and personal property and other assets required to be collected under federal law.

(3) Require the State Department of Health Care Services to implement the option in the State Medicaid Manual to waive its claim, as a substantial hardship, when the estate subject to recovery is a homestead of modest value, subject to federal approval.

(4) Prohibit recovery from the estate of a deceased Medi-Cal member who is survived by a spouse or registered domestic partner.

(5) Ensure that Medi-Cal members can easily and timely receive information about how much their estate may owe Medi-Cal when they die.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department shall claim against the estate of the decedent, or
 against any recipient of the property of that decedent by distribution, an amount equal to the payments for the health care services received or the value of the property received by any recipient from the decedent by distribution, whichever is less, only in either of the following circumstances:

(1) Against the real property of a Medi-Cal member of any age who meets the criteria in Section 1396p(a)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code and who was or is an inpatient in a nursing facility in accordance with Section 1396p(b)(1)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) (A) The decedent was 55 years of age or older when the individual received health care services.

(B) The department shall not claim under this paragraph when there is any of the following:

(i) A surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner.

(ii) A surviving child who is under 21 years of age.

(iii) A surviving child who is blind or disabled, within the meaning of Section 1614 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1382c).

(c) (1) The department shall waive its claim, in whole or in part, if it determines that enforcement of the claim would result in substantial hardship to other dependents, heirs, or survivors of the individual against whose estate the claim exists.

(2) In determining the existence of substantial hardship, in addition to other factors considered by the department consistent with federal law and guidance, the
 department shall, subject to federal approval, waive its claim when the estate subject to recovery is a homestead of modest value.

(3) The department shall notify individuals of the waiver provision and the opportunity for a hearing to establish that a waiver should be granted.

(d) If the department proposes and accepts a voluntary postdeath lien, the voluntary postdeath lien shall accrue interest at the rate equal to the annual average rate earned on investments in the Surplus Money Investment Fund in the calendar year preceding the year in which the decedent died or simple interest at 7 percent per annum, whichever is lower.

(e) (1) The department shall provide a current or former member, or his or her authorized representative designated under Section 14014.5, upon request, a copy of the
 amount of Medi-Cal expenses that may be recoverable under this section through the date of the request. The information may be requested once per calendar year for a fee to cover the department’s reasonable administrative costs, not to exceed five dollars ($5) if the current or former member meets either of the following descriptions:

(A) An individual who is 55 years of age or older when the individual received health care services.

(B) A permanently institutionalized individual who is an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for the intellectually disabled, or other medical institution.

(2) The department shall permit a member to request the information described in paragraph (1) through the Internet, by telephone, by mail, or through other commonly available electronic means. Upon receipt of
 the request for information described in paragraph (1), the department shall work with the member to ensure that the member submits documentation necessary to identify the individual and process the member’s request.

(3) The department shall conspicuously post on its Internet Web site a description of the methods by which a request under this subdivision may be made, including, but not limited to, the department’s telephone number and any addresses that may be used for this purpose. The department shall also include this information in its pamphlet for the Medi-Cal Estate Recovery Program and any other notices the department distributes to members specifically regarding estate recovery.

(4) Upon receiving a request for the information described in paragraph (1) and all necessary supporting documentation, the department shall provide the information requested within 90 days after
 receipt of the request.

(f) The following definitions shall govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Decedent” means a member who has received health care under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) and who has died leaving property to others through distribution.

(2) “Dependents” includes, but is not limited to, immediate family or blood relatives of the decedent.

(3) “Estate” means all real and personal property and other assets in the individual’s probate estate that are required to be subject to a claim for recovery pursuant to Section 1396p(b)(4)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) “Health care services” means only those services required to be
 recovered under Section 1396p(b)(1)(B)(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(5) “Homestead of modest value” means a home whose fair market value is 50 percent or less of the average price of homes in the county where the homestead is located, as of the date of the decedent’s death.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall apply only to individuals who die on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 30, Sec. 22.   (SB 833)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.6.

(a) As a result of providing medical assistance for home and facility care to an individual, the state shall, by operation of law, become a remainder beneficiary, to the extent required by Section 1917(e) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(e)), of annuities purchased in whole or in part by the individual or the individual’s spouse in which the individual or the individual’s spouse is an annuitant, except as provided in Section 14009.7, unless the individual or the individual’s spouse notifies the department in writing that they prohibit the state from acquiring a remainder interest in their annuity, in which case subdivision (d) shall apply.

(b) This section shall only apply to the following annuities:

(1) Those purchased on or after February 8, 2006.

(2) Those purchased before February 8, 2006, and subjected to a transaction that occurred on or after February 8, 2006.

(A) For the purposes of this paragraph, “transaction” includes, but is not limited to, any action taken by the individual or the individual’s spouse that changes the course of payments to be made by the annuity or the treatment of the income or principal of the annuity.

(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, “transaction” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Routine changes and automatic events that do not require any action or decision on or after February 8, 2006.

(ii) Changes that occur based on the terms of the annuity that existed prior to February 8, 2006, and that do not require a decision, election, or action to take effect.

(iii) Changes that are beyond the control of the individual or the individual’s spouse.

(c) Any provision in any annuity subject to this section that has the effect of restricting the right of the state to become a remainder beneficiary is void.

(d) If an individual or the individual’s spouse notifies the department in writing that they prohibit the state from acquiring a remainder interest in their annuity, the purchase of the annuity shall be treated as the transfer of an asset for less than fair market value that is subject to Section 14015.

(e) (1) When the state becomes aware of an annuity in which it has acquired a remainder interest, the department shall notify the issuer of the annuity of the state’s acquisition of its remainder beneficiary interest.

(2) The issuer of the annuity shall, upon notification by the department, immediately inform the department of the amount of income and principal being withdrawn from the annuity as of the date of the individual’s disclosure of the annuity.

(3) The issuer of the annuity shall, upon request by the department or any agent of the department, immediately disclose to the department the amount of income and principal being withdrawn from the annuity.

(4) The issuer of the annuity shall immediately notify the department if there is any change in either of the following:

(A) The amount of income or principal being withdrawn from that annuity.

(B) The named beneficiaries of the annuity.

(f) Any moneys received by the state pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(g) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(h) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section
 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 104) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 80.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.6.

(a) As a result of providing medical assistance for home and facility care to an individual, the state shall, by operation of law, become a remainder beneficiary, to the extent required by Section 1917(e) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(e)), of annuities purchased in whole or in part by the individual or the individual’s spouse in which the individual or the individual’s spouse is an annuitant, except as provided in Section 14009.7, unless the individual or the individual’s spouse notifies the department in writing that they prohibit the state from acquiring a remainder interest in their annuity.

(b) This section shall only apply to the following annuities:

(1) Those
 purchased on or after February 8, 2006.

(2) Those purchased before February 8, 2006, and subjected to a transaction that occurred on or after February 8, 2006.

(A) For the purposes of this paragraph, “transaction” includes, but is not limited to, any action taken by the individual or the individual’s spouse that changes the course of payments to be made by the annuity or the treatment of the income or principal of the annuity.

(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, “transaction” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Routine changes and automatic events that do not require any action or decision on or after February 8, 2006.

(ii) Changes that occur based on the terms of the annuity
 that existed prior to February 8, 2006, and that do not require a decision, election, or action to take effect.

(iii) Changes that are beyond the control of the individual or the individual’s spouse.

(c) Any provision in any annuity subject to this section that has the effect of restricting the right of the state to become a remainder beneficiary is void.

(d) (1) When the state becomes aware of an annuity in which it has acquired a remainder interest, the department shall notify the issuer of the annuity of the state’s acquisition of its remainder beneficiary interest.

(2) The issuer of the annuity shall, upon notification by the department, immediately inform the department of the amount of income and principal being withdrawn
 from the annuity as of the date of the individual’s disclosure of the annuity.

(3) The issuer of the annuity shall, upon request by the department or any agent of the department, immediately disclose to the department the amount of income and principal being withdrawn from the annuity.

(4) The issuer of the annuity shall immediately notify the department if there is any change in either of the following:

(A) The amount of income or principal being withdrawn from that annuity.

(B) The named beneficiaries of the annuity.

(e) Any moneys received by the state pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(f) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(g) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 105) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 81.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 80 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.7.

(a) If an annuity is considered part or all of the community spouse resource allowance allowed under subdivision (c) of Section 14006, the state shall only become a remainder beneficiary of that portion of the annuity that is not a part of that community spouse resource allowance.

(b) The state shall not become a remainder beneficiary of an annuity that is any of the following:

(1) Purchased by a community spouse with resources of the community spouse during the continuous period in which the individual is receiving medical assistance for home and facility care and after the month in which the individual is determined eligible for these benefits.

(2) Contained in a retirement plan qualified under Title 26 of the United States Code, established by an employer or an individual, including, but not limited to, an Individual Retirement Annuity or Account (IRA), Roth IRA, or Keogh fund.

(3) An annuity that is all of the following:

(A) The annuity is irrevocable and nonassignable.

(B) The annuity is actuarially sound.

(C) The annuity provides for payments in equal amounts during the term of the annuity, with no deferral and no balloon payments made from the annuity.

(c) The individual or the community spouse, or both, shall bear the burden of demonstrating that the requirements of
 this section that limit the state’s right to become a remainder beneficiary, as described in Section 14009.6, are met.

(d) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(e) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from
 the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 106) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 82.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.7.

(a) The state shall not become a remainder beneficiary of an annuity that is any of the following:

(1) Purchased by a community spouse with resources of the community spouse before or during the continuous period in which the individual is receiving medical assistance for home and facility care and after the month in which the individual is determined eligible for these benefits.

(2) Contained in a retirement plan qualified under Title 26 of the United States Code, established by an employer or an individual, including, but not limited to, an Individual Retirement Annuity or Account (IRA), Roth IRA, or Keogh fund.

(3) An annuity
 that is all of the following:

(A) The annuity is irrevocable and nonassignable.

(B) The annuity is actuarially sound.

(C) The annuity provides for payments in equal amounts during the term of the annuity, with no deferral and no balloon payments made from the annuity.

(b) The individual or the community spouse, or both, shall bear the burden of demonstrating that the requirements of this section that limit the state’s right to become a remainder beneficiary, as described in Section 14009.6, are met.

(c) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) and any regulations adopted pursuant to that
 act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(d) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 107) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 83.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 82 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14010.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the parent or parents of a person under 21 years of age shall not be held financially responsible, nor shall financial contribution be requested or required of such parent or parents for health care or related services to which the person may consent under any express provision of law, including, but not limited to, Sections 6924, 6925, 6926, 6927, 6928, and 6929 of the Family Code, and including, but not limited to, maternity home care, social service counseling, and other services related to
 pregnancy of the person which are provided by a licensed maternity home.

Federal financial participation in providing such services shall not be claimed to the extent that the exemption from financial responsibility provided by this section is inconsistent with federal law.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), the parent or parents of a person under 21 years of age, who is living in the home of the parent or parents, shall be held financially responsible for health care or related services to which the person under 21 years of age may consent pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 7050 of the Family Code, but excluding health care and or related services to which a person may consent under Sections 6924, 6925, 6926, 6927, 6928, and 6929 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

(a) An applicant who is not a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) shall be required to file an affirmation setting forth facts about their annual income and other resources and qualifications for eligibility as may be required by the department. Those statements shall be on forms prescribed by the department.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, eligibility for medical assistance for
 applicants shall not be granted until the applicant or designated representative provides independent documentation verifying statements of the following:

(1) Gross income by type and source.

(2) Income amounts withheld for
 taxes.

(3) Health care benefits available through employment, retirement, military service, work related injuries or settlements from prior injuries.

(4) Employee retirement contributions, and other employee benefit contributions, deductible expenses for maintenance or
 improvement of income-producing property and status and value of property owned, other than property exempt under Section 14006. The director may prescribe those items of exempt property that the director deems should be verified as to status and value in order to reasonably assure a correct designation of those items as exempt.

(c) The verification requirements of subdivision (b) apply to income, income deductions and property both of applicants for medical assistance, excluding applicants for public assistance, and to persons whose
 income, income deductions, expenses or property holdings must be considered in determining the applicant’s eligibility and spend down of excess income.

(d) A determination of eligibility and spend down of excess income may be extended beyond otherwise prescribed timeframes if, in the county department’s judgment, and subject to standards of the director, the applicant or designated representative has good cause for failure to provide the required verification and continues to make a good faith effort to provide verification.

(e) To the extent permitted by federal law, in addition to the other verification requirements of this section, a county department may require verification of any other applicant statements, or conduct a full and complete investigation of the statements, whenever a
 verification or investigation is warranted in the judgment of the county department.

(f) If documentation is unavailable, as defined in regulations promulgated by the department, the applicant’s signed statement as to the value or amount shall be deemed to constitute verification.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 108) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 84.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

(a) An applicant who is not a recipient of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) shall be required to file an affirmation setting forth facts about their annual income and qualifications for eligibility as may be required by the department. Those statements shall be on forms prescribed by the department.

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, eligibility for medical assistance for applicants shall not be granted until the applicant or designated representative provides independent documentation verifying statements of all of the following:

(1) Gross income by type and source.

(2) Income amounts withheld for taxes.

(3) Health care benefits available through employment, retirement, military service, work-related injuries or settlements from prior injuries.

(c) The verification requirements of subdivision (b) apply to income and income deductions of applicants for medical assistance, excluding applicants for public assistance, and to persons whose income, income deductions, or expenses must be considered in determining the applicant’s eligibility and spend down of excess income.

(d) A determination of eligibility and spend down of excess income may be extended beyond otherwise prescribed timeframes if, in the county department’s judgment, and subject to standards of the director, the applicant or designated representative has good cause for failure to provide the required
 verification and continues to make a good faith effort to provide verification.

(e) To the extent permitted by federal law, in addition to the other verification requirements of this section, a county department may require verification of any other applicant statements, or conduct a full and complete investigation of the statements, whenever a verification or investigation is warranted in the judgment of the county department.

(f) If documentation is unavailable, as defined in regulations promulgated by the department, the applicant’s signed statement as to the value or amount shall be deemed to constitute verification.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 109) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 85.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 84 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.1.

(a) The department shall, not later than July 1, 1998, create and implement a simplified application package for the following Medi-Cal applicants, as described under Section 1902(l)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(l)(3)):

(1) Children.

(2) Pregnant women and infants.

(b) In developing the application package described in this section, the department shall seek input from the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board and persons with expertise, including beneficiary representatives, counties, and beneficiaries.

(c) The department shall permit an applicant to whom subdivision (a) applies to apply for benefits by mailing in the simplified application package. The package shall include, but not be limited to, the following items, as they now exist or may be changed from time to time:

(1) An application for cash aid, CalFresh, and Medi-Cal.

(2) A statement of citizenship, alienage, and immigration status.

(3) A
 statement of facts.

(4) Important information for persons requesting Medi-Cal.

(5) The Child Health and Disability Prevention Program brochure.

(d) The department shall not require an applicant who submits a simplified application pursuant to subdivision (c) to complete a face-to-face interview, except for good cause, a suspicion of fraud, or to complete the application process. Every application package shall contain a notification of the applicant’s right to complete a face-to-face interview.

(e) The department shall implement this section only to the extent that its provisions are not violative of the requirements of federal law, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 60.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.10.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 14053.7, 14053.8, and 14184.800, benefits provided under this chapter to an individual who is an inmate of a public institution shall be suspended in accordance with Section 1396d(a)(31)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e).

(b) A county welfare department shall notify the department within 10 days of receiving information that an individual on Medi-Cal in the county is or will be an inmate of a public institution.

(c) Until October 1, 2020, if an individual is a Medi-Cal beneficiary on the date they become an inmate of a public institution, their benefits under this chapter and under Chapter 8 (commencing with
 Section 14200) shall be suspended effective the date they become an inmate of a public institution. The suspension shall end on the date they are no longer an inmate of a public institution or one year from the date they become an inmate of a public institution, whichever is sooner.

(d) Commencing October 1, 2020, and through December 31, 2022, inclusive, if an individual is a Medi-Cal beneficiary on the date they become an inmate of a public institution, their benefits under this chapter and under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) shall be suspended effective the date they become an inmate of a public institution. The suspension shall end according to the following:

(1) For an individual who is not defined as a juvenile under Section 1396a(nn)(1)(A) or 1396a(nn)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the suspension shall end on the date the individual is no longer
 an inmate of a public institution or one year from the date the individual becomes an inmate of a public institution, whichever is sooner.

(2) For an individual who is defined as a juvenile under Section 1396a(nn)(1)(A) or 1396a(nn)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the suspension shall end in accordance with Section 1396a(a)(84) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or one year from the date the individual becomes an inmate of a public institution, whichever is later.

(e) (1) Commencing January 1, 2023, if an individual is a Medi-Cal beneficiary on the date they become an inmate of a public institution, their benefits under this chapter and under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) shall be suspended effective the date they become an inmate of a public institution.

(2) For an
 individual who is defined as a juvenile under Section 1396a(nn)(1)(A) or 1396a(nn)(1)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and for an individual who is not defined as a juvenile under these sections to the extent permissible under federal law, the suspension shall end on the date the individual is no longer an inmate of a public institution, if otherwise eligible.

(f) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, including the County Welfare Directors Association of California and advocates, shall develop and implement a redetermination of eligibility, to the extent required by federal law, pursuant to Section 14005.37, for individuals referenced in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) and subdivision (e) whose eligibility is suspended pursuant to this section.

(g) This section does not create a state-funded benefit or program. Health care services under this chapter and
 Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) shall not be available to inmates of public institutions whose Medi-Cal benefits have been suspended under this section.

(h) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent allowed by federal law. This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approval of state plan amendments or other federal approvals have been obtained.

(i) This section shall be implemented on January 1, 2010, or the date when all necessary federal approvals are obtained, whichever is later.

(j) By January 1, 2010, or the date when all necessary federal approvals are obtained, whichever is later, the department, in consultation with the Chief Probation Officers of California and the County Welfare Directors
 Association of California, shall establish the protocols and procedures necessary to implement this section, including any needed changes to the protocols and procedures previously established to implement Section 14029.5.

(k) The department shall determine whether federal financial participation will be jeopardized by implementing this section and shall implement this section only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

 (l) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title
 2 of the Government Code.
